lang_data/mni-fonipa/morph_mni-fonipa.lexd
STEM
nóŋ
baǰi
hapkәtlə́gə
kəna
khungətlə́gə
phuŋgá
phúnán
tharǝ́gǝ
se
hə́yjǝnbǝ
məral
ení
koyləyləyrə́gə
hǝ́wgǝtle
ǝ́humdusu
pák
həymə
hoy
čarǝ́gǝ
suŋ
haynǝ
khom
ǰi
man
lǝyribǝdudǝ
pum
thoy
čé
urәmmi
čhiŋ
yeŋliŋəydə
púŋ
lól
lakpǝsi
thum
sə́ná
čə́phú
ǝmǝdi
rumal
kərino
wakhal
ha
bəm
héʔlǝmmí
yǝ́wnǝ
páyrǝkandǝ
čénkhirəmmí
ó
bu
sum
drúm
nəttrəgə
phot
təm
teythoktúnə
bák
cәtkhre
koŋgrés
bišatapanǰi
lǝ́mbisi
gyan
lǝyrǝmmǝdǝ́nǝ
ʔiʔi
mǝpadu
lumal
ləmbidugi
cycledudǝydǝ
әmuk
ǝdu
pótsidǝ
pháwrǝ́gǝ
khúllǝ́gǝ
mateŋ
herá
ná
amunbasi
pərikhya
ǝ́humsubǝ
әdusu
nəhál
gun
ŋarǝ́gǝ
thәudúnə
puǰa
tusənminnəre
pírəmbə
sannәdúnə
yi
phəjənə
әmәsuŋ
pírǝkʔi
trúk
čǝ́tlǝkandǝ
әhum
ləyrəkansidə
kə́ŋ
tə́rúk
da
yeŋ
ofis
čəka
ə́y
nəm
su
ŋәksәmdәgi
ə́humdudə
thә́mdúnə
mǝŋondǝ
núpímǝ́čásidǝ
ǝ́ŋáŋse
í
oǰa
phə́n
bón
hannǝgi
bán
amunba
əmədə
munnǝ
kǝrikǝri
núpímə́čási
ǝdǝydi
kúmthərəklə́bədə
húribә
yéphəwre
mǝkhadǝ
khámhǝllǝ́gǝ
ǝ́humdunǝ
kǝrǝmaynǝ
ǝ́hum
sinemə
əŋáŋ
thíbədə
hát
khura
seba
uhәudәdәnә
mǝkhoŋdǝ
phaw
hékləkpədə
lə́m
ták
toŋŋəgə
ŋákra
yúm
ru
teythokʔə́gə
khәllәmmí
toŋŋəkpə
table
hə́klibə
naspatisi
nuŋthil
lakkhirəmmí
pakhaŋ
é
ǝ́mǝkhǝknǝ
tadǝdunǝ
pódón
pərsént
máo
pót
kandǝ
mánә
hairə́gə
ku
rép
edvərtais
haydə́nə
yayŋə́ŋ
lǝyrǝmmi
núpámə́čásinə
talǝksidǝ
sər
semistər
lap
ǝ́ŋáŋsiŋdunǝ
ŋəsaygi
kənthoktúnə
nóy
mə́ŋa
ah
bárkay
nát
mǝnǝ
ǝ́mǝdunǝ
ləyrəmdəbəsidə
khámmǝ́gǝ
turәmmi
thǝ́wrǝ
kumthәrәkpәgi
ukandǝ
purəge
əŋənbə
pəra
ǰhútmút
ŋon
lupa
potčəy
núpímə́čásidə
tá
yu
mәkhadә
yeŋŋәmmi
part
čánə́bəgidəməktə
tupise
phét
biday
hǝydokʔe
mǝ́si
ǝykhoygi
lupá
čəmprasi
tanǰa
útí
paŋŋe
čúrúp
tələb
núpásidi
yam
toŋŋǝ́gǝ
kórə́w
phə́rə́ŋ
iyó
tǝwriŋǝy
driŋ
láy
məntri
bi
tháŋgǝtle
mə́rúp
məpudunə
mǝdugi
karimatta
mətəmni
čhén
phút
tadunə
yénnǝrǝ́gǝ
satri
kǝymǝtǝ
ball
satrə
en
tahǝwbǝ
mǝʔoŋodǝ
intrədus
koroŋgroŋgroŋ
mayay
hə́ŋčít
héklәmmí
hek
ŋəčháy
khoŋŋǝkandǝ
bicycle
ǝdum
čačadúnə
tárə́gə
íšro
hǝndǝkti
khún
tәpnә
nə́tte
kháy
pa
núpámǝčá
šə́w
phaudúnə
әsum
tusinlə́bə
sabə
kəyrak
treniŋ
gegegege
hm
məyamnə
mǝtuŋsidǝ
čə́tkədəwbə
páw
manә
ǝysi
kakhәtliŋәi
núpáməčásiŋdunə
táp
famər
ǝ́humjisu
ədey
ǝykhoynǝ
dhúp
bəl
mәtәmdudә
ču
hapcәnbә
lǝ́mbisidǝ
bədnam
khə́nləmmí
má
әmәdә
məmannəbə
leptúnə
ləwge
iʔhé
khunbidunə
ǰaw
bháp
háppire
phiptipaive
ri
kumthәre
hey
TT
oyrǝmmǝni
mənaksidə
óh
okhák
məmannəbəsiŋ
ǰəgá
yeŋŋǝdǝ́nǝ
ŋәsaigi
čabǝ
khawdudə
əy
mәkhoinә
lakpǝsidǝysidǝ
ǝdǝgidi
masasu
təpnə
hәidokʔәmmi
bebhar
hairibә
taw
m
gə́n
әdudә
rita
ti
ta
huysel
kákhǝtlibǝ
sitthǝrǝ
phawdənə
ǰeŋ
envəlop
phə́r
theŋjənlə́gə
a
farmer
phəm
loyrǝdǝ́nǝ
karə́ydə
sumaynǝ
ŋŋə́k
rol
lak
hapcәn
ímuŋ
yoŋ
há
mukhí
mə́háraǰ
cycledǝ
khúl
mə́há
gaw
khə́ŋ
mәdudә
thəmbəni
khittəŋ
khə́mbraŋ
basket
čiŋŋǝgǝ
ǰuwari
ə́humsidə
ǝ́mǝdǝgi
yay
wani
bhap
čə́béŋ
təreŋ
húrallə́gə
sannə sannə
ə́ŋáŋ
hóŋ
tusinle
uthə́ktəgi
ŋǝ́kʔiŋǝy
moygə
thəndunə
phurit
təpta
khoŋŋǝ́gǝ
təwkhini
tháŋgǝttǝ́nǝ
pírəmmə́gə
də
kábrəŋ
ə́humkhəksi
ləyhəwre
oy
hameŋdu
illə́gə
čhu
bháy
mǝmannǝbi
phiptiwan
pharmer
theŋnәrәmmi
yaw
suti
čánə́bə
íšiŋ
kolej
tupigǝ
hə
khə́lləkʔi
niŋŋay
hǝ́wgǝtlǝ́gǝ
thǝ́wrǝ́gǝ
čǝ́tkhre
risə́rč
rí
ubǝkandǝ
tubǝdu
hápčinnə́bə
əygya
ŋə́kčanəribə
mǝmannǝbisidǝ
bəyni
thǝmmibǝ
čanǝ́bǝ
trək
pú
lokel
bíkhá
praybet
həyma
ka
kəymə
hápčənge
Khwairəmbəm
madi
hǝydokke
əʔ
həydokʔibəgi
lakkansidǝ
tǝwʔi
kákhǝttǝ́nǝ
təruk
šiŋ
háw
bharǰa
naspatigadu
kal
pas
luman
upay
theŋnәdúnə
čarǝčarǝ́gǝ
hékʔidudə
yeŋde
sámu
ә́mәnә
írón
məmit
khoŋŋi
deli
máygáy
lakpǝ
bičar
səl
koleǰ
cәtpә
tallǝktudǝ
garigadu
әdugi
e
phagi
haynə
čə́tpəsi
mǝdudǝgidi
ya
yəwyəw
kə́lləkk
yénthoknərə́gə
čəŋlaklə́gə
dum
húm
hayrubə
pers
nupamәcadúnə
nuŋjaw
tə́p
pik
páybədə
čǝŋdǝ́nǝ
ray
éʔ
óʔ
nə
thənləmmí
bani
ə́dəydi
ma
kəday
gól
maŋə́ktə
bén
ǝdumaynǝ
yǝ́wbǝkandǝ
sannәbә
lanbə
thommǝ thommǝ́gǝ
hékčinləkpənə
lonnə
pulis
stand
siki
tə́rét
pullibǝ
íhe
mǝthǝ́ktǝ
hápčinbidǝnǝ́gǝ
kəwdunə
hápcəlləmmí
waŋ
purəgə
təwnəbəsidə
cycle
illǝ́gǝ
hə́wdóŋ
nə́ŋ
šakhi
kəya
tə́l
pu
thǝlhǝllǝgenǝ
lakʔǝkansidǝ
khungǝtpire
khoŋŋəkpə
ǰwar
ǝmǝttǝ
khomjinlə́gə
khǝk
kə́tə́n
phə́t
pəysa
tombi
kúmthǝrǝkpǝ
phaynəl
kákhətkhi
iǰət
tupi
húranbəsu
kwá
məpu
lóynə
hak
píbəsidə
káŋbu
ʔha
hélóy
tay
yóm
yeŋdǝ́nǝ
ǝsidǝ
tabә
boy
yeŋthokpəsidə
yenəkhá
iskul
həwrə
čithi
ekspiriens
kərəm
kaynǝ
strayk
ní
theŋ
sukʔu uhəwdre
hə́knə́bə
ǝ́ŋáŋdu
lǝyhǝwre
hápčilli
gal
khəbər
ibetombi
sigi
hainә
ǝ́múk
buckettudə
ləybaksidə
skolarsip
səbhá
pəysá
keso
hǝwjikki
mǝkhoŋdudǝ
thəwrəklə́gə
həyeŋ
thok
ŋǝsáygi
čǝŋǝkʔǝ́gǝ
čə́tləkpədəgi
thoydokpǝ
thí
vidya
tanjasidǝ
ə́məgidə́mək
boldu
loynəmək
saykəl
kǝrino tǝwrisibo kayna
thák
ləphút
khǝ́ndúnǝ
sə́námə́hí
haydunə
ləw
khámmǝdǝ́nǝ
šəw
taribә
láyrəw
čhum
khúnde
ə́humsinə
húranbəgi
ŋə́raŋ
thəŋ
mǝtǝmni
leppe
tháŋŋe
әdugә
kúmthərəkkansidə
naspa
tik
núpáməčásisu
pí
kəyno
tahəwribə
məmaŋdə
hayphetkə
həwáy
thəmlibə
khum
ǝ́ŋáŋdunǝ
súk
nuŋsa
raǰkəynə
khə́k
məŋ
nte
búk
tahǝwbǝdu
hun
thə́wrəmmí
tə́dubi
sadhəbiget
háppirə́gə
ləyyu yadre
raŋ
hékthəge
hekʔi
lǝ́mbigi
ləyrəmdúnə
jə́báŋ
dewali
ǝdudǝ
yetlibə
tudǝ́nǝ
mǝdǝgi
krosiŋ
tháŋdǝ́nǝ
mərəktəgi
toŋ
hápčanle
páythokhǝwre
әdudәgi
pán
sen
mə́khoy
rúk
moysi
khamməgə
tǝwbǝno
ǝ́humdu
hápčǝ́nle
hǝ́wgǝtpidǝ́nǝ
ǝ́humsidǝ
núpáməčádu
ǝ́humsinǝ
kǝyraktudǝ
yəysinlə́gə
núpádunǝ
gega
ren
šiloŋ
khawdudǝ
takhirәmmi
badminton
mi
yawrəmdre
mə
dúk
әmәsu
məmannə́bə
héy
purá
kərəmbə
mm
lǝ́wthokʔǝ́gǝ
tík
prə́p
ŋəsay
haybǝgi
bil
púkhrí
khungәttunә
mə́háraǰa
cyclese
mǝkhóŋdǝ
čurup
pók
ədwaydəgi
ləyhəwʔi
mǝteŋ
thə́w
hékʔibә
phí
čə́y
məsəm
yeŋdənə
həydokkhibə
puribә
ŋaihak
mǝkhoŋdu
dəsa
pubǝdu
núŋ
nupá
budhí
čəy
yénsaŋ
huysennə
ǰá
thǝllǝ́gǝ
lǝyre
hénǰaŋ
khoy
thǝllǝ́bǝ
čǝ́tlǝkansidǝ
sá
ší
tuphǝmsidǝ
lәuge
side
garlz
cycledә
dərgas
hápčinbirə́gə
hékpǝ
Bluhil
kǝysu
metrik
čiŋŋə́kpəsidə
tennis
oyrəmalle
pres
nəhárol
kon
urururu
bhállo
məthəŋdə
lǝyrǝmdre
ǝdugǝ
dó
hә́úgәtlə́gə
ley
məpal
lép
lapləknə
pripərešə́n
núpáməčásigi
ŋǝnta
íl
énəm
túmin
mə́ri
theŋjənbədəgidi
sə́m
Sərat
héknǝ́bǝ
kaʔ
ǝmǝdǝ
ləp
mәkhoŋnә
mǝpusi
páteysori
әdәgi
əduk
kəri
tə́ŋ
hərawmənkhidənə
ənáŋ
niŋ
nyaw
kha
khittǝŋ
ubǝdǝ
yeŋŋukandǝ
páybǝ
ŋǝsáy
mǝŋóndǝ́gǝ
ǰibə
ləmbidə
takhibә
soydənə
ǝ́humdudǝgi
tanjadudǝydǝ
lǝyriŋǝysidǝ
wak
ǰiŋ
yen
nag
səm
lǝyriŋǝy
háppǝ́gǝ
mǝthǝktǝgi
čawbǝ
khǝllǝ́gǝ
yeŋthorǝkʔi
məŋə́ksəmdə
kallaktana
nuŋ
yáwbǝdúnǝ
budhi
loyrəkansidəgi
čepthəhəllə́gə
yáwbǝ
lə́k
thə́ynə́bədə
əkoybədə
hə́y
šə́k
huy
póláŋse
tičər
pərikha
lallə́gə
khǝ́nlǝmbǝdǝgi
ǝdǝ
ŋәktәnә
ǝyukki
morok
čénsinlǝklǝ́gǝ
saikəl
yéʔ
prəp
dú
oh
dukan
khəŋhəwdə́nə
thəllə́gə
ləmən
čaŋčaŋsinləktúnə
tabәsu
ǝthǝnbǝ
čǝ́tli
mǝri
әsidә
túŋ
tháŋŋəkʔəkansidəydi
hékpəgi
bol
tagor
hékpә
thommǝ́gǝ
čín
khaw
bidya
mәphәm
khǝrǝ
tanjadudǝ
páythokhǝ́wre
numít
ǝ́mǝmǝm
lakʔibə
nupimәca
tǝwridu
núŋdum
әmәnә
lakʔǝ́gǝ
kәurәmmi
háydənə
təy
sitthǝdǝ́nǝ
túm
tәudúnə
hə́ysi
mǝdu
tənan
thoŋgǝtpidǝ́nǝ
bičhar
aša:
mәtaŋ
cyclegǝ
póynu
məharaǰa
aʔ
kərigi
pi
thaway
hayde
bat
čárǝ́gǝ
horel
təw
teǰurur
lakləmmíbə
adə
thə́k
thillukandǝ
udəbə
әudәgi
nuŋsit
yeŋŋi
help
phə́m
məŋə́ktə
top
tabletenniski
iŋkhon
həl
khá
tǝplitǝpli
ho
hál
ŋayhakki
hәujikki
thər
gan
um
polisi
máyren
təwrəmdənə
háyregə
ibuŋŋo
búŋŋo
mǝtǝmsidǝysidǝ
ləyrige
thóŋ
ləyriŋəysidə
təŋ
hə́ygadu
sé
fel
du
naspati
ǝ́hummukni
mәtәm
khǝ́ŋdǝ́nǝ
mǝkhoŋsi
nupamәcadusu
opposite
həydoklə́bə
tuminnə
әŋaŋ
hék
ǝdǝgi
sokpra
púp
thə́wdúnə
moja
pay
ənəbə
lok
núpímǝ́čá
sí
ə́ŋ
khə́rə
laklәmmí
tə́n
lәihәurәmmi
dəkhína
thə́ŋ
thəwrəkpəyne
lǝyrǝmmǝkandǝ
ləy
punnə
ǰəw
láŋ
tón
mǝnáktǝ
hékliŋәi
bə́s
híŋ
yeŋŋǝmde
húranbə
әdum
núpáməcasinə
sunu
hameŋ
póláŋdudǝ
ləyriŋəydudə
maŋ
hum
ímphal
na
tóm
ǝdunǝ
wá
thǝ́wrǝkʔǝ
ŋәktunә
cәtpәdudә
toktok
kəynose
lәirə́gә
thumoksimə
mari
pírǝkʔe
khəl
sél
ururururu
mǝtǝmsidǝ
nanthoktǝ́nǝ
éksə́n
ǝ́nísubǝ
čən
ǝ́humkhǝk
pámbí
sannǝ́bǝ
ubǝ
túp
nəttrəbədi
yénšaŋ
čəŋsinləkʔi
yeŋkhǝtli
papi
kǝnthoktǝ́nǝ
koyototlə́gə
ǝ́ní
thəlle
khoŋnaŋ
hékʔǝ́bǝ
paǰi
thǝlle
barton
ǝ́mǝ
ínšaŋ
daŋ
dóp
kaydəno
šúp
sawn
ǝdǝydǝgi
háy
píribə
yeŋŋǝktǝbǝdudǝ
purgenə
čə́tkadəwribə
numil
noŋma
həydokpədəgi
soydǝnǝ
i
khungətpirəmmí
lәibaktә
pər
sisinə
hayphetkǝ
khǝllǝkʔe
hídák
kloǰ
turiŋәi
hə́ydu
níŋŋol
sə́k
páythokkhirəmmí
purəklibə
impresə́n
mən
lísíŋ
khók
siŋ
lón
ráŋ
hápcillə́gə
yénthoknəre
thənlə́gə
ǝ́ŋáŋ
zaw
pírure
hə́ygi
hóren
masu
hayphet
raǰyə
toŋdre
sék
theŋjәndúnə
ról
aaaummm
məkha
čá
šə́m
pirǝkpǝdu
cyclegadu
ǰel
hé
muk
lay
ə́w
phǝtlawnǝ
hapcәnlәmmí
yeŋŋubǝ
mǝʔoŋni
múk
ǝ́mǝgǝ
kuthi
wari
nupamәca
takhǝtlǝ́gǝ
kǝyrak
pá
čiŋ
yúk
háp
theŋnǝkhibǝ
parti
cәtkhibәdu
ure
mə́hárani
yeŋbә
lə́ykhom
theŋaynə́bədə
tháŋ
nid
skóp
soy
intərbyu
nəw
sel
tomba
mәdu
tháŋŋəkʔə́gə
yuk
yə́wsinləkle
theŋŋǝ́gǝ
məharaǰ
niŋthəw
hayphét
uphul wayphul
ŋəsi
hékʔidu
rəp
ǝmǝkhǝk
ə́humdugi
kəynodunə
tiŋəktiŋək
məŋgé
héktúnǝ
watləmmí
mí
thǝwdre
ubǝdudǝ
hó
bucket
də́m
təŋəktəŋək
bók
lǝyribǝ
góy
gét
bháw
miŋ
khóy
hóy
nə́há
moynǝ
khunjənbə
soda
buŋŋo
čǝ́tkhi
gari
dayrek
khallə́gə
kót
yǝ́wrǝktriŋǝysidǝ
koysən
nətte
wóŋ
sén
kə́y
ádǝ
yeŋŋǝkandǝ
noŋ
illǝgǝ
naspatidudǝ
mǝtǝmsidǝydǝ
dəw
hisap
nuŋdum
mannәrәmmi
áy
tolop
gon
thwáy
thumok
hékkhre
oyrəmməni
hukum
khǝ́nbǝgi
theŋjǝnlǝ́gǝ
mə́ytəy
thənle
šway
tupisu
əsaygi
yeŋŋəgə
ləyrəmbədəgi
thók
məthəksidə
ǰadu
gún
thoydoknǝ
hən
həwǰík
pháw
phirép
phi
lóŋgá
lәmbidә
pírəkʔi
haybǝsi
rúm
hékʔiŋəy
cәtlәmmí
tǝwribǝ
khə́n
persiŋ
panə
somdə
walking
hékʔibǝ
sit
hol
bak
təwnə́bəsidə
ǝ́múkkǝsu
tahə́wribə
həy
thokləklibə
tǝwkandudǝ
puŋkak
mú
yé
mәtәmdә
čə́thənkhirəmmí
núpádudi
thəwna
həwǰik
səmaǰ
hák
gón
huyselgǝ
kə́drə́k
čiŋəčiŋə
piktak
lǝ́wge
kəy
grəmar
náʔ
raǰkəyna
sém
pírәmmi
cәtkhirәmmi
lan
daktər
məphi məroldu
klas
čə́tkədəwribəni
aa
kərəmnə
tǝŋ
koy
nákǝl
bənán
hékʔәmmi
úm
aaa
ǰat
thumoktudә
mə́y
rə́m
nní
әsidәydә
mǝŋóndǝ
teks
thə́wdúna
khə́rúŋ
kóíyeŋ
əma
tǝpnǝtǝpnǝ
singh
yáw
khə́y
daytó
lәirәmdәbәdudә
yeŋŋǝ́ktre
ŋəntá
khóŋmojagadu
taŋ
čin
ǝmǝ́romdǝgi
məl
ləyge
әdúnə
thəmməmbədu
lǝybǝdudǝ
ten
šé
purǝ́gǝ
kəmdəwnə
khittaŋ
baro
ék
mərúp
sekpǝdǝwnǝ́gǝ
mәnaktә
də́t
kakhәtlәmmí
nəŋ
ə́hanbədəgi
thawrǝkandǝ
kúmthǝrǝkʔǝ́gǝ
ləydúnə
kəlləkk
bay
kákhətləmmí
ə
eme
lipə́t
iŋgit
hut
lǝyrǝmdǝbǝsi
do
tha
məyay
mәkhoi
cyclesidǝ
uuu
ǝ́du
somdəgi
ǝ́múksu
ŋə́si
lumandunǝgǝ
čə́yribə
čaniŋŋe
čhuŋ
əča
yeŋbǝdǝgidi
čəhi
nesnəl
kəyam
lóynǝ
tanja
hannǝ
hékʔǝmbǝsidǝ
púkhə́m
Meitei
mahak
si
héktə́nə
ni
məntrə
thә́nnәbә
tusinlibə
nák
məphəm
kәnnә
viǰilens
khərə
tǝwre
də́
thel
bú
kə́n
numit
tə́w
món
mǝtǝmdudǝdi
čeŋ
yeŋŋǝ́gǝ
ǝ́mǝnǝ
pan
thiyori
satra
enitaym
tanjasidə
kúmthǝrǝkpǝdǝ
lǝyrǝmme
thə́bə́k
mai
hékpǝdǝ
məkhoykhəy
tə́k
sən
ʔaa
kó
mənipuri
itú
pírəmlibə
ča
oǰá
dərbar
háŋ
mǝkhoydǝ
sannǝrǝmmi
moygadu
pát
ǝduy
yénnǝdǝ́nǝ
húranbənə
babu
eʔ
hékʔə
póláŋsiŋdu
yaurәmmi
khoŋraw
khamlə́gə
hékʔǝmbǝ
ibema
not
skutər
kumthәrәkpә
úŋ
biǰines
watlibə
thə́wkhre
theŋnǝre
then
sét
mǝtuŋdǝ
lóy
khəy
seriyə́s
lǝ́mbi
kay
hotnəy
skaf
kona
khunǰənlə́gə
iŋə́kŋə́kʔə́gə
cyclesidə
trét
khungətle
óy
ŋáŋ
kákhǝtkhibǝ
səhumne
naw
thǝmme
әni
nay
uppǝ
oyrə́gə
héklibә
Nimay
páythǝhǝ́wbǝ
səhumsidə
iyá
čét
ə́s
núpímǝ́čádu
oyrəboy níŋbra khə́nde
khə́l
nəttre
bál
píbirəkʔe
cycledudǝ
kǝwre
uplibә
niŋthə́w
də́k
yeŋniŋdǝ́nǝ
yénnǝre
čə́hí
nətʔe
núpámǝ́čá
lí
sat
čəŋdunə
wakhǝl
cross
woy
әma
həydu
haydunǝ
umm
magə
lәmbi
bibahkərmə
héra
ihé
kəray
garí
sitcinlәktәnә
phul
khoŋ
әdu
núpáməčásigə
čák
hərawbə
kəriməttə́
póláŋdumǝ
treǰəri
səruk
ә́du
lǝy
khunbǝdǝgi
bə́k
səmməgə
tuŋ
gol
pambi
hannəgumnə
haybǝ
laŋ
yə́wrə́gə
u
íš
čaw
ǝ́mǝdu
thillure
tu
ʔóŋ
khóŋ
sokʔisokte
rum
thǝllǝdǝ́nǝ
layrik
phə́dí
yeŋŋǝ́kte
məmaŋsidə
nəhán
ə́nígumbəsi
layrík
kənthokminnərə́gə
ar
lakpә
manǝ
mǝʔoŋdu
mud
seketəri
o
yeŋdə́nə khotnə
dos
ŋá
kók
iŋkhol
